arapaho.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [VERB]
! Verb Stem Types
[II] [IA] [TI] [TA]
! Orders
[AFFIRMATIVE] [NON_AFFIRMATIVE] [IMPERATIVE] [CONJUNCT] [SUBJUNCTIVE] [ITERATIVE]
! Number
[SG] [PL]
! Person-Number for Subjects
[1SG-SUBJ] [2SG-SUBJ] [3SG-SUBJ] [4SG-SUBJ] [1PL-SUBJ] [2PL-SUBJ] [3PL-SUBJ] [4PL-SUBJ] [1PL-EXCL-SUBJ] [1PL-INCL-SUBJ]
! Person-Number for Objects
[1SG-OBJ] [2SG-OBJ] [3SG-OBJ] [4SG-OBJ] [1PL-OBJ] [2PL-OBJ] [3PL-OBJ] [4PL-OBJ] [1PL-EXCL-OBJ] [1PL-INCL-OBJ]
! Person without explicit marking of Number
[3P-OBJ] [4P-OBJ] [3P-SUBJ] [4P-SUBJ]
! Inclusive vs. Exclusive distinction in 1st Person Plural
[INCL] [EXCL]
! prefixes to verb stem
[NEG] [PROCLITIC] [IMPERF] [INTERR] ! [THEME_MARKER]
! tense or infinitive
[PRESENT] [PAST] [FUTURE] [INF]
! aspect
[PROGRESSIVE] [PERFECTIVE] [IMPERFECTIVE] [SIMPLE]
[PERSON]
! Initial Change
[IC]
! Mood
[INTERROGATIVE] [DECLARATIVE] [NEGATIVE]
! Type of Direction of Action for TA verbs
[LocalAction] [DirectAction] [InverseAction]
! Irregular Form
[IRREGULAR] [OLD_VERSION]

! Flags
! Part of Speech
@U.POS.Verb@
! Verb Stem Type
@U.StemType.II@ @U.StemType.AI@ @U.StemType.TI@ @U.StemType.TA@
! Order
@U.Order.AFF@ @U.Order.NAFF@ @U.Order.IMP@ @U.Order.CONJ@
! Present Perfect or Present Progressive
@U.TAM.PresPerf@ @U.TAM.PresProg@
! tense
@U.TAM.Past@ @U.TAM.Present@ @U.TAM.Future@
! aspect
@U.TAM.Perfect@ @U.TAM.Prog@ @U.TAM.Perfective@ @U.TAM.Imperfective@ @U.TAM.Simple@ @U.TAM.NotImperfective@
! Mood
@U.Mood.Question@ @U.Mood.Declarative@ @U.Mood.Negative@
! Morpheme Boundaries
@U.Stem.Initial@ @U.Stem.Final@
! Initial Change forms
@U.IC.Yes@
! Direction of Action for TA Verbs
@U.ActionType.Local@ @U.ActionType.Direct@ @U.ActionType.Inverse@
! Exceptions in AI verb stem class
@U.ExceptionAI.Yes@ @U.ExceptionAI.No@
! Backward TA verbs where direction of action does not correspond to/is the inverse of English, like "to agree"
@U.Backward.Yes@ @U.Backward.No@

! PERNUM AGREEMENT !
@U.PERNUM.1SGS@ @U.PERNUM.1PLS@ @U.PERNUM.12S@ @U.PERNUM.2SGS@ @U.PERNUM.2PLS@ @U.PERNUM.3SGS@ @U.PERNUM.3PLS@ @U.PERNUM.4SGS@ @U.PERNUM.4PLS@
@U.PERNUM.1SGSAI@ @U.PERNUM.1PLSAI@ @U.PERNUM.12SAI@ @U.PERNUM.2SGSAI@ @U.PERNUM.2PLSAI@ @U.PERNUM.3SGSAI@ @U.PERNUM.3PLSAI@ @U.PERNUM.4SGSAI@ @U.PERNUM.4PLSAI@
@U.PERNUM.1S2S@ @U.PERNUM.1S2P@ @U.PERNUM.2S1S@ @U.PERNUM.2P1S@ @U.PERNUM.1P2S@ @U.PERNUM.1P2P@ @U.PERNUM.2S1P@ @U.PERNUM.2P1P@
@U.PERNUM.1S3S@ @U.PERNUM.1S3P@ @U.PERNUM.2S3S@ @U.PERNUM.2S3P@ @U.PERNUM.3S4@ @U.PERNUM.4S4@ @U.PERNUM.1P3S@ @U.PERNUM.1P3P@
@U.PERNUM.123@ @U.PERNUM.2P3@ @U.PERNUM.3P4@ @U.PERNUM.4P4@ @U.PERNUM.3S1S@ @U.PERNUM.3P1S@ @U.PERNUM.3S2S@ @U.PERNUM.3P2S@
@U.PERNUM.43S@ @U.PERNUM.44S@ @U.PERNUM.3S1P@ @U.PERNUM.3P1P@ @U.PERNUM.312@ @U.PERNUM.32P@ @U.PERNUM.43P@ @U.PERNUM.44P@

! polarity
@U.Polarity.Negative@ @U.Polarity.Positive@


! Arapaho Lexicon
@U.LEX.cebisee@

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Main Lexicon !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root
! only taking care of verbs for now
! marks a word as verb, tagging it as verb and flagging it as verb, no change in form
@U.POS.Verb@[VERB]:@U.POS.Verb@0     StemInit;


LEXICON StemInit
@U.LEX.cebisee@@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@:@U.LEX.cebisee@@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@0               Ordering;

LEXICON Ordering
@U.Order.AFF@[AFFIRMATIVE]:@U.Order.AFF@0       AffOrder;
@U.Order.NAFF@[NON_AFFIRMATIVE]:@U.Order.NAFF@0  NaffOrder;
@U.Order.IMP@[IMPERATIVE]:@U.Order.IMP@0        ImpOrder;
@U.Order.CONJ@[CONJUNCT]:@U.Order.CONJ@0         ConjOrder;

LEXICON AffOrder
                Tense;

LEXICON NaffOrder
            Question;

LEXICON ImpOrder
        # ;

LEXICON ConjOrder
        # ;


LEXICON Question
@U.Mood.Question@[INTERROGATIVE]:@U.Mood.Question@koo^  NaffStemType;
@U.Mood.Declarative@[DECLARATIVE]:@U.Mood.Declarative@0            NaffStemType ;


LEXICON NaffStemType
@U.StemType.II@[II]:0    NaffPersonII;
@U.StemType.AI@[AI]:0    NaffPersonAI;
@U.StemType.TI@[TI]:0    NaffPersonTI;
@U.StemType.TA@[TA]:0    NaffPersonTA;

LEXICON NaffPersonII
@U.PERNUM.1SGS@[1SG-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1SGS@^            Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.1PLS@[1PL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1PLS@^            Imperfective ;

LEXICON NaffPersonAI
@U.PERNUM.1SGSAI@[1SG-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1SGSAI@ne^      Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.1PLSAI@[1PL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1PLSAI@ne^      Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.12SAI@[1PL-INCL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.12SAI@e^    Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.2SGSAI@[2SG-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2SGSAI@e^       Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.2PLSAI@[2PL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2PLSAI@e^       Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.3SGSAI@[3SG-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3SGSAI@^        Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.3PLSAI@[3PL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3PLSAI@^        Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.4SGSAI@[4SG-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4SGSAI@^        Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.4PLSAI@[4PL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4PLSAI@^        Imperfective ;

LEXICON NaffPersonTI
@U.PERNUM.1SGS@[1SG-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1SGS@ne^      Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.1PLS@[1PL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1PLS@ne^      Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.12S@[1PL-INCL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.12S@e^  Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.2SGS@[2SG-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2SGS@e^       Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.2PLS@[2PL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2PLS@e^       Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.3SGS@[3SG-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3SGS@^        Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.3PLS@[3PL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3PLS@^        Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.4SGS@[4SG-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4SGS@^        Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.4PLS@[4PL-SUBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4PLS@^        Imperfective ;

LEXICON NaffPersonTA
@U.PERNUM.1S2S@[1SG-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1S2S@e^   Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.1S2P@[1SG-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1S2P@e^   Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.2S1S@[2SG-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2S1S@e^   Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.2P1S@[2PL-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2P1S@e^   Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.1P2S@[1PL-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1P2S@e^   Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.1P2P@[1PL-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1P2P@e^   Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.2S1P@[2SG-SUBJ][1PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2S1P@e^   Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.2P1P@[2PL-SUBJ][1PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2P1P@e^    Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.1S3S@[1SG-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1S3S@ne^    Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.1S3P@[1SG-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1S3P@ne^    Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.2S3S@[2SG-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2S3S@e^    Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.2S3P@[2SG-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2S3P@e^    Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.3S4@[3SG-SUBJ][4P-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3S4@^    Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.4S4@[4SG-SUBJ][4P-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4S4@^    Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.1P3S@[1PL-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1P3S@ne^    Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.1P3P@[1PL-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.1P3P@ne^    Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.123@[1PL-INCL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.123@e^    Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.2P3@[2PL-SUBJ][3P-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.2P3@e^    Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.3P4@[3PL-SUBJ][4P-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3P4@^    Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.4P4@[4PL-SUBJ][4P-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.4P4@^    Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.3S1S@[3SG-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3S1S@ne^   Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.3P1S@[3PL-SUBJ][1SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3P1S@ne^   Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.3S2S@[3SG-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3S2S@e^   Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.3P2S@[3PL-SUBJ][2SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3P2S@e^   Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.43S@[4P-SUBJ][3SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.43S@^   Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.44S@[4P-SUBJ][4SG-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.44S@^   Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.3S1P@[3SG-SUBJ][1PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3S1P@ne^   Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.3P1P@[3PL-SUBJ][1PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.3P1P@ne^   Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.312@[3P-SUBJ][1PL-INCL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.312@e^    Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.32P@[3P-SUBJ][2PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.32P@e^    Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.43P@[4P-SUBJ][3PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.43P@^    Imperfective ;
@U.PERNUM.44P@[4P-SUBJ][4PL-OBJ]:@U.PERNUM.44P@^   Imperfective ;


LEXICON Imperfective   ! just for NAFF
@U.Order.NAFF@@U.TAM.Imperfective@[IMPERFECTIVE]:@U.TAM.Imperfective@ii^   Tense ;
@U.Order.NAFF@@U.TAM.NotImperfective@:@U.TAM.NotImperfective@0      Tense ;
!@U.Order.AFF@@U.TAM.Imperfective@[IMPERFECTIVE]:@U.TAM.Imperfective@ii^   Perfective ;
!@U.Order.AFF@:0       Perfective ;


LEXICON Tense
@U.Order.AFF@@U.TAM.Past@[PAST]:@U.TAM.Past@ih^              ImperfectiveAff;
@U.Order.AFF@@U.TAM.Present@[PRESENT]:@U.TAM.Present@^       ImperfectiveAff;
@U.Order.AFF@@U.TAM.Future@[FUT]:@U.TAM.Future@eti^         ImperfectiveAff;
@U.Order.NAFF@@U.TAM.Past@[PAST]:@U.TAM.Past@ih^              Negation;
@U.Order.NAFF@@U.TAM.Present@[PRESENT]:@U.TAM.Present@^       Negation;
@U.Order.NAFF@@U.TAM.Future@[FUT]:@U.TAM.Future@eti^         Negation;


LEXICON ImperfectiveAff
@U.Order.AFF@@U.TAM.Imperfective@[IMPERFECTIVE]:@U.TAM.Imperfective@ii^   VerbStem ;
@U.Order.AFF@@U.TAM.NotImperfective@:@U.TAM.NotImperfective@0       Perfective ;

LEXICON Negation
@U.Polarity.Negative@[NEG]:@U.Polarity.Negative@ihoowu^         Perfective;
@U.Polarity.Positive@:@U.Polarity.Positive@0                    Perfective;


LEXICON Perfective
@U.TAM.Imperfective@:0                                                              VerbStem;
@U.TAM.NotImperfective@@U.TAM.Perfective@[PERFECTIVE]:@U.TAM.Perfective@iisi^       VerbStem;
@U.TAM.NotImperfective@:0                                                           VerbStem;



LEXICON VerbStem
! input the lexicon, i.e. verb stems. mark the final boundary of stem, give each stem its stem type, and direct them to the next step.
!oosoo@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.II@            StemType;
!nihooyoo@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.II@             StemType;
!iisetee@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.II@             StemType;
!ni'oow@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.TA@@U.Backward.Yes@[to_agree_with_someone]:ni'oow@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.TA@@U.Backward.Yes@0          StemType;
@U.LEX.cebisee@cebisee%[walk%]@U.Stem.Final@:cebisee@U.Stem.Final@0               StemType;
!iinooniw@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.TA@@U.Backward.Yes@[be_mother_of]:iinooniw@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.TA@@U.Backward.Yes@0      StemType;
!tei'eihi@U.Stem.Final@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemType.AI@         StemType;
!beteee@U.Stem.Final@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemType.AI@         StemType;
!bene@U.Stem.Final@@U.ExceptionAI.Yes@@U.StemType.AI@             StemType;
!noohoot@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.TI@               StemType;
!bii'in@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.TI@               StemType;
!nii'eeneet@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.TI@               StemType;
!noohow@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.TA@                 StemType;
!cih’oh@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.TA@                 StemType;
!nii’eenew@U.Stem.Final@@U.StemType.TA@                 StemType;


LEXICON StemType
! for each stem type, tag and flag it with its stem type.
@U.Order.NAFF@:0       NaffPerson2;
@U.Order.AFF@:0       Aff;







LEXICON NaffPerson2
@U.Order.NAFF@@U.StemType.II@:0    NaffPerson2II;
@U.Order.NAFF@@U.StemType.AI@:0    NaffPerson2AI;
@U.Order.NAFF@@U.StemType.TI@:0    NaffPerson2TI;
@U.Order.NAFF@@U.StemType.TA@:0    NaffPerson2TA;

LEXICON NaffPerson2II
@U.PERNUM.1SGS@:0            # ;
@U.PERNUM.1PLS@:^be         # ;

LEXICON NaffPerson2AI
@U.PERNUM.1SGSAI@:^      # ;
@U.PERNUM.1PLSAI@:^be      # ;
@U.PERNUM.12SAI@:^n  # ;
@U.PERNUM.2SGSAI@:^       # ;
@U.PERNUM.2PLSAI@:^be       # ;
@U.PERNUM.3SGSAI@:^        # ;
@U.PERNUM.3PLSAI@:^no'        # ;
@U.PERNUM.4SGSAI@:^n        # ;
@U.PERNUM.4PLSAI@:^níno        # ;

LEXICON NaffPerson2TI
@U.PERNUM.1SGS@:^      # ;
@U.PERNUM.1PLS@:^éébe      # ;     !ask Andy, we have two forms for this: -éébe and -owúbe  , which one I should keep?
@U.PERNUM.12S@:^ow  # ;
@U.PERNUM.2SGS@:^       # ;
@U.PERNUM.2PLS@:^éébe       # ;
@U.PERNUM.3SGS@:^        # ;
@U.PERNUM.3PLS@:^owuu        # ;
@U.PERNUM.4SGS@:^owun        # ;
@U.PERNUM.4PLS@:^owuníno        # ;
